Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Meetings and Action of Board of Directors

271B.8-200.
Meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during this meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means shall be deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 78, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.8-205.
Court-ordered meeting.

The Circuit Court for the county where a corporation’s principal office or, if there is none in this state, its registered office is located may order a special meeting of the board of directors on the application of one-third (1/3) or more of the incumbent number of directors. The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, and enter such other orders as are necessary to accomplish the purpose of the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 133, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

271B.8-210.
Action without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by this chapter to be taken at a board of director’s meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the board. The action shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director, and included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section shall be effective when the last director signs the consent, unless the consent specifies a different effective date.

A consent signed under this section shall have the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 79, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-220.
Notice of meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors shall be preceded by at least two (2) days’ notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
80, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
65, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
65, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

271B.8-230.
Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by this Act, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the waiver shall be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting shall waive any required notice to him of the meeting, unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon his arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 81, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-240.
Quorum and voting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number, a quorum of a board of directors shall consist of:

A majority of the fixed number of directors if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

A majority of the number of directors prescribed, or if no number is prescribed the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if the corporation has a variable-range size board.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of no fewer than one-third (1/3) of the fixed or prescribed number of directors determined under subsection (1) of this section.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present shall be the act of the board of directors, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors when corporate action is taken shall be deemed to have assented to the action taken unless:

He objects at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon his arrival) to holding it or transacting business at the meeting;

His dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

He delivers written notice of his dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or to the corporation immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention shall not be available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 82, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-250.
Committees — Powers — Limitations — Alternate members.

Unless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one (1) or more committees and appoint one (1) or more members of the board of directors to serve on any such committee.

Unless this chapter provides otherwise, the creation of a committee and appointment of members to it shall be approved by the greater of:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

The number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws to take action under KRS

271B.8-240

.

KRS

271B.8-200

to

271B.8-240

shall apply both to committees of the board and to their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each committee may exercise the powers of the board of directors under KRS

271B.8-010

.

A committee shall not, however:

Authorize or approve distributions, except according to a formula or method, or within limits, prescribed by the board of directors;

Approve or propose to shareholders action that this chapter requires be approved by shareholders;

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or, subject to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, on any of its committees; or

Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee shall not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in KRS

271B.8-300

.

The board of directors may appoint one (1) or more directors as alternate members of any committee to replace any absent or disqualified member during the member’s absence or disqualification. Unless the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or the resolution creating the committee provide otherwise, in the event of the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting may unanimously appoint another director to act in place of the absent or disqualified member.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 83, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 20, effective July 15, 2002.